Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1587
Director, defined.

Director shall mean the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 56;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 18.
July 18, 2026